test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-wapam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wâpam - ok : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwâpamâw
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwâpamâw
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwâpamânân
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamânaw
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamâwâw
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: wâpamêw
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: wâpamêyiwa

     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niwâpamâwak
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiwâpamâwak
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niwâpamânânak
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiwâpamânawak
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiwâpamâwâwak
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: wâpamêwak
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: wâpamêyiwa
     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: wâpamêyiwa
     
#     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1Sg: kiwīcihin not done yet
#     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1Pl: kiwîcihinân
#     wâpam+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1Sg: kiwîcihinâwâw
     
     
     
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamak, êwâpamak]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamat, êwâpamat]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamât, êwâpamât]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyit, êwâpamâyit]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyâhk, êwâpamâyâhk]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyahk, êwâpamâyahk]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyêk, êwâpamâyêk]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâcik, êwâpamâcik]
     wâpam+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyit, êwâpamâyit]

     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wâpam
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamâtân
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamihk     
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamik
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâtânik
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamihkok
     
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamâhkan
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamâhkahk
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamâhkêk
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamâhkanik
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâhkahkok
     wâpam+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamâhkêkok
     
